Hawaii statutes.
[§23-95] Review for 2022 and every fifth
year thereafter. (a) The credits and deductions under the income tax and
financial institutions tax listed in subsection (c) shall be reviewed in 2022
and every fifth year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and
recommendations of the reviews to the legislature and governor at least twenty
days prior to the convening of the immediately following regular session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Section 235-5.5--Deduction for individual housing
account deposit;

(2) Section 235-7(f)--Deduction of property loss due
to a natural disaster;

(3) Section 235-16.5--Credit for cesspool upgrade,
conversion, or connection;

(4) Section 235-19--Deduction for maintenance of an
exceptional tree;

(5) Section 235-55.91--Credit for the employment of a
vocational rehabilitation referral;

(6) Section 235-110.2--Credit for in-kind services
contribution for public school repair and maintenance; and

(7) Sections 235-110.8 and 241-4.7--Credit for
ownership of a qualified low-income housing building. [L 2016, c 245, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next